Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 1. INTRODUCTORY PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 4. NOTICE OF ELECTION

Sec. 4.001. NOTICE REQUIRED. Notice of each general and special election shall be given as provided by this chapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 4.002. AUTHORITY RESPONSIBLE FOR GIVING NOTICE. Except as otherwise provided by law, the following authority shall give notice of an election:

(1) the county judge of each county wholly or partly in the territory covered by the election, for an election ordered by the governor;

(2) the presiding officer of the governing body of a political subdivision, for an election ordered by the presiding officer or the governing body; and

(3) the authority ordering the election, for an election ordered by any other authority.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 4.003. METHOD OF GIVING NOTICE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c), notice of an election must be given by any one or more of the following methods:

(1) by publishing the notice at least once, not earlier than the 30th day or later than the 10th day before election day:

(A) in a newspaper published in the territory that is covered by the election and is in the jurisdiction of the authority responsible for giving the notice; or

(B) in a newspaper of general circulation in the territory if none is published in the jurisdiction of the authority responsible for giving the notice;

(2) by posting, not later than the 21st day before election day, a copy of the notice at a public place in each election precinct that is in the jurisdiction of the authority responsible for giving the notice; or

(3) by mailing, not later than the 10th day before election day, a copy of the notice to each registered voter of the territory that is covered by the election and is in the jurisdiction of the authority responsible for giving the notice.

(b) In addition to any other notice given for an election under Subsection (a), not later than the 21st day before election day, a county shall post a copy of a notice of the election given by the county or provided to the county under Section 4.008(a), which must include the location of each polling place, on the county's Internet website, if the county maintains a website. An authority responsible for giving notice of an election may post a copy of the notice on the bulletin board used for posting notices of the meetings of the governing body of the political subdivision that the authority serves. If a county does not maintain a website, the authority responsible for giving notice of the election shall post a copy of a notice of the election on the bulletin board used for posting notices of the meetings of the governing body of the political subdivision that the authority serves. For each precinct that is combined to form a consolidated precinct under Section 42.008, not later than the 10th day before election day, the authority shall also post, at the polling place used in the preceding general election, notice of the precinct's consolidation and the location of the polling place in the consolidated precinct. A notice posted under this subsection must remain posted continuously through election day.

(c) In addition to any other notice given, notice of an election ordered by the governor, by a county authority, or by an authority of a city or school district must be given by the method prescribed by Subsection (a)(1).

(d) If other law prescribes the method of giving notice of an election, that law supersedes this section, except that Subsection (c) applies regardless of the notice requirements prescribed by other law with respect to an election covered by that subsection.

(e) The authority responsible for giving notice of the election shall deliver to the secretary of state a copy of the notice of a consolidated precinct required by Subsection (b) not later than the date of the election.

(f) A debt obligation election order required under Section 3.009 shall be posted:

(1) on election day and during early voting by personal appearance, in a prominent location at each polling place;

(2) not later than the 21st day before the election, in three public places in the boundaries of the political subdivision holding the election; and

(3) during the 21 days before the election, on the political subdivision's Internet website, prominently and together with the notice of the election, the contents of the proposition, and any sample ballot prepared for the election, if the political subdivision maintains an Internet website.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 114, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 554 (S.B. 637), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 726 (H.B. 440), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1052 (H.B. 933), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 4.004. CONTENTS OF NOTICE. (a) The notice of a general or special election must state:

(1) the nature and date of the election;

(2) except as provided by Subsection (c), the location of each polling place;

(3) the hours that the polls will be open;

(4) the Internet website of the authority conducting the election; and

(5) any other information required by other law.

(b) The notice of a special election must also state each office to be filled or the proposition stating each measure to be voted on. This subsection does not apply to an election on a proposed constitutional amendment.

(c) If notice of an election is given by posting the notice in the various election precincts, the notice posted in a precinct is not required to state the location of the polling places in other precincts.

(d) If precincts are consolidated under Section 42.008, the notice must state which precincts have been combined to form each consolidated precinct in addition to the locations of the polling places in the consolidated precincts.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1235 (S.B. 1970), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 2817), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 4.005. RECORD OF NOTICE. (a) If notice of an election is given by publication, the authority responsible for giving the notice shall retain a copy of the published notice that contains the name of the newspaper and the date of publication.

(b) For each notice posted under Section 4.003(a)(2) or (b), the person posting the notice shall make a record at the time of posting stating the date and place of posting. The person shall sign the record and deliver it to the authority responsible for giving the election notice after the last posting is made.

(c) If notice of an election is given under Section 4.003(a)(3), the authority responsible for giving the notice shall:

(1) retain a copy of the notice and enter on the copy the date or dates the mailing occurred; and

(2) prepare a list of the names and addresses of the persons to whom the notice was mailed.

(d) The authority responsible for giving the election notice shall preserve the records required by this section for the period for preserving the precinct election records.

(e) If other law prescribes the method of preserving the notice of an election, that law supersedes this section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 7.01, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 4.006. FAILURE TO GIVE NOTICE OF GENERAL ELECTION. Failure to give notice of a general election does not affect the validity of the election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 4.007. NOTICE TO ELECTION JUDGE. Not later than the 15th day before election day or the seventh day after the date the election is ordered, whichever is later, the authority responsible for giving notice of the election shall deliver to the presiding judge of each election precinct in which the election is to be held in the authority's jurisdiction a written notice of:

(1) the nature and date of the election;

(2) the location of the polling place for the precinct served by the judge;

(3) the hours that the polls will be open;

(4) the judge's duty to hold the election in the precinct specified by the notice; and

(5) the maximum number of clerks that the judge may appoint for the election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 4.008. NOTICE TO COUNTY CLERK. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the governing body of a political subdivision, other than a county, that orders an election shall deliver notice of the election, including the location of each polling place, to the county clerk and voter registrar of each county in which the political subdivision is located not later than the 60th day before election day. The county clerk shall post notice of the election, including the location of each polling place, on the county's Internet website, if the county maintains a website, as provided by Section 4.003(b).

(b) The governing body of a school district that orders an election under Section 26.08, Tax Code, to ratify an ad valorem tax rate adopted by the governing body under Section 26.05(g) of that code shall deliver notice of the election to the county clerk of each county in which the school district is located not later than the 30th day before election day.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1107 (H.B. 2309), Sec. 1.05, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 195 (H.B. 3062), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1328 (H.B. 3646), Sec. 79, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1052 (H.B. 933), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 4.009. INTERNET POSTING. (a) Not later than the 21st day before election day, a county that holds or provides election services for an election and maintains an Internet website shall post on its public Internet website for an election of public officials or of a governmental entity authorized by law to impose a tax administered by the county:

(1) the date of the election;

(2) the location of each polling place;

(3) each candidate for an elected office on the ballot; and

(4) each measure on the ballot.

(b) Not later than the 21st day before election day, a city or independent school district that holds an election and maintains an Internet website shall post on the public Internet website for the city or independent school district, as applicable:

(1) the date of the next election;

(2) the location of each polling place;

(3) each candidate for an elected office on the ballot; and

(4) each measure on the ballot.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 436 (S.B. 1116), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.